Washington statutes.
RCW 18.32.0361

Compensation of commission members.

Each member of the commission shall be compensated in accordance with RCW 43.03.265. Members shall be reimbursed for travel expenses incurred in the actual performance of their duties, as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060. Commission members shall be compensated and reimbursed for their activities in developing or administering a multistate licensing examination, as provided in this chapter.

[ 1999 c 366 s 3; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 208.]